West Virginia, session 2025, HB2159.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 5. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS. §9-5-34. Interest on overpayments.Except where otherwise provided by law, all overpayments due to programs administered by the Bureau for Medical Services shall bear interest at the rate fixed and applied under §56-6-31(b) as provided in this section per annum. "Overpayment" is defined as an amount paid for participation in the programs under the bureau's administration which exceeds the amount that is allowable for the goods or services provided. Interest on overpayments shall be the sum of the interest amounts calculated on the unpaid balance for each year or part thereof, using the interest rate in effect for each respective year or part thereof. No interest shall accrue during the first thirty days following the date that an overpayment determination is finalized. Thereafter, interest shall accrue from the thirty-first day until the date the balance, including accrued interest, is resolved. Interest collected shall be retained by the fund from which the overpayment was made. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home